Maine, session 132, LD1296.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §1197, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 1991, c. 631, is amended to
read:
1. Parts or labor; satisfaction of warranty. If a franchisor requires or permits a
franchisee to perform labor or provide parts to satisfy a warranty created by the franchisor,
the franchisor shall properly and promptly fulfill its warranty obligations and:
A. Reimburse the franchisee at the retail rate customarily charged for any all parts
provided used by the franchisee to satisfy the warranty. If the franchisor provides a part
to the franchisee for a specific warranty repair, the franchisor shall compensate the
franchisee for the difference between the cost of the part to the franchisee and the full
Page 1 - 132LR2161(03)

retail price of the part, which may not exceed 100% of the total reimbursement cost
under paragraph B of the labor required to perform the repair; and
B. Reimburse the franchisee for any actual labor performed by the franchisee to satisfy
the warranty, which must be reasonable and supported by the franchisee's records.
Reimbursement for labor may not be less than the retail rate customarily charged by
that franchisee for the same labor when not performed to satisfy a warranty. To be
entitled to reimbursement under this section, a franchisee must post in a place
conspicuous to service customers the rate for labor not performed to satisfy a warranty.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2161(03)